Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Equipment and Operation [Repealed]

65-16-201 — 65-16-206. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 16, part 2, §§ 65-16-201 — 65-16-206 (Acts 1887 ch. 15 § 1, ch. 65, § 1; 1889, ch. 40, § , ch. 230, § 1; 1901, ch. 69, §§ 1, 2; 1923, ch. 18, §§ 1-3; Shan., §§ 2394, 2398, 2406, 2411a13, 2411a14; Shan. Supp., §§ 1582a8 — 1582a10; Code 1932, §§ 2644 — 2646, 4015, 4020, 4027, 4047, 4048; Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; 1981, ch. 264, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-1710 — 65-1714; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113), concerning street and interurban railroads, equipment and operation, was repealed by Acts 2003, ch. 19, § 2, effective April 11, 2003.